Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202680-417
Pets for Vets Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Pets for Vets Cash Fund is created for the purpose of administering the veteran grant program created under section 80-416. The fund shall consist of money credited to the fund pursuant to section 60-3,163.02. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2020, LB944, § 89;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 66.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.